Wyoming, session 2026, HB0130.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-125 is created to read:

HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
1-39-125. Liability; enforcement of federal
regulation of firearms, firearm accessories, magazines and
ammunition.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 9-14-203.

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ix), 1-39-104(a) and
9-14-203 are amended to read:

1-39-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(ix) "This act" means W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-123 1-39-125.

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112 and 1-39-122 through
1-39-124 1-39-125. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

9-14-203. Prohibiting the enforcement of federal
regulation of firearms, firearm accessories, magazines and
ammunition; penalties; defense of Wyoming citizens.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
this state and all political subdivisions of this state are
prohibited from using any personnel or funds appropriated
by the legislature of the state of Wyoming, or any other
source of funds that originated within the state of
Wyoming, any federal funds and any other source of funds
solely to enforce, administer or cooperate with attempt to
enforce, provide material aid, support or participate in
any manner in the enforcement or implementation of any
unconstitutional act, law, treaty, executive order, rule or
HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
regulation of the United States government that infringes
on or impedes the free exercise of individual rights
guaranteed under the Second Amendment of the Constitution
of the United States solely regarding firearms, accessories
or ammunition against any law abiding citizen.

(b) Nothing in this act section shall limit or
restrict a public officer, as defined in W.S.
6-5-101(a)(v), or a peace officer, as defined by W.S.
7-2-101(a)(iv), from providing assistance to federal
authorities for purposes not specifically identified in
subsection (a) of this section. Nothing in this act
section shall be construed to prohibit Wyoming governmental
entities from accepting federal assistance or funds for law
the enforcement purposes of laws in this state.

(c) Any agency of the state, political subdivision or
law enforcement agency that employs any public officer, as
defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), or peace officer, as defined
in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv), who knowingly violates subsection
(a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of
not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both any
HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
provision of this section against any law abiding citizen
while acting under the direction of an official, agent,
employee or deputy of the United States government, or
otherwise acting under the color of federal or state law,
shall be liable to the injured party for damages resulting
from the public officer's or peace officer's conduct in a
civil action before a court of competent jurisdiction. The
court, upon finding a violation as described in this
section, shall impose a civil penalty against the agency,
political subdivision or law enforcement agency in an
amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) per violation
and may order any injunctive or other equitable relief as
permitted by law. The court shall hold a hearing on a
motion for injunctive or equitable relief within thirty
(30) days of service of the petition. In addition:

(i) An interested party may bring a civil action
to enforce the provisions of this section. A court of
competent jurisdiction may order injunctive or other
equitable relief, recovery of damages or other legal
remedies permitted by law and payment of reasonable
attorney fees;

HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
(ii) Sovereign immunity shall not be an
affirmative defense in any action brought pursuant to this
subsection.

(d) Any agency of the state, political subdivision or
law enforcement agency that employs any public officer, as
defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), or peace officer, as defined
in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv), who previously acted as an
official, agent, employee or deputy of the United States
government, and who knowingly commits any of the following
acts on or after July 1, 2026 shall be subject to a civil
penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for each
such employee employed by the agency of the state,
political subdivision or law enforcement agency who:

(i) Enforces, attempts to enforce or
participates in any manner in the enforcement or
implementation of any federal act, executive order,
administrative order, rule, regulation, statute or
ordinance solely regarding firearms, accessories or
ammunition;

HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
(ii) Gives material aid or support to the
efforts of another in the enforcement or implementation of
any federal act, executive order, administrative order,
rule, regulation, statute or ordinance solely regarding
firearms, accessories or ammunition.

(e) A person does not violate the provisions of this
section when:

(i) The person provides material aid to federal
officers in pursuit of a suspect when there is a
demonstrable criminal nexus with another state or country
and such suspect is either not a citizen of this state or
is not present in this state;

(ii) The person provides material aid to federal
prosecutors for felony violations involving controlled
substances or violations against another person when such
prosecution includes weapons violations substantially
similar to the laws of this state if such weapons
violations are ancillary to such prosecution;

HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
(iii) Accepting federal assistance for the
enforcement of the laws of this state.

(f) Any public officer, as defined in W.S.
6-5-101(a)(v), or peace officer, as defined by W.S.
7-2-101(a)(iv), who knowingly violates subsection (a) of
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not
more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

(i) Preclude any investigation and lawful
seizure of firearms, accessories or ammunition related to
violations of Wyoming law;

(ii) Impose liability for civil penalties under
this section on individual public officers or peace
officers.

(h) As used in this section:

HB0130

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0053
CORRECTED COPY
(i) "Law abiding citizen" means a person who is
not otherwise precluded under state law from possessing a
firearm and shall not be construed to include any person
who is not legally present in the United States or the
state of Wyoming;

(ii) "Material aid" includes but is not limited
to voluntarily giving or allowing others to make use of
lodging, communications equipment or services including
social media accounts, facilities, weapons, personnel,
transportation, clothing or other physical assets.
"Material aid" shall not include the giving or allowing the
use of medicine or other materials necessary to treat
physical injuries or assistance provided to help persons
escape a serious and present risk of life threatening
injuries.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0130